District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Rental Housing Registration Data Integrity Temporary Amendment Act
of 2026”.
Sec.2. Section 205(f) of the Rental Housing Act of 1985, July 17, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-10;
D.C. Official Code § 42-3502.05(f)), is amended by adding a new paragraph (5) to read as
follows:
“(5)(A) The owner of a rental accommodation that is exempt from rent
stabilization pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall, at the time of registration, provide
the following information for each rental unit:
“(i) The current monthly rent amount;
“(ii) The monthly rent amount charged for the same unit during
each of the 2 prior calendar years; and
“(iii) The utilities, facilities and services, and appliances.
“(B) The information required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph
shall be submitted only at the time of registration and shall not be subject to any ongoing or
annual reporting requirements.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2